Hawaii statutes.
§664-35 Costs. Costs may, in the
discretion of the court, be divided, or taxed to the losing party. [L 1886, c
69, §5; am L 1888, c 26, §5; am L 1907, c 56, §5; RL 1925, §2940; RL 1935,
§3681; RL 1945, §10222; RL 1955, §234-34; HRS §664-35; am L 1972, c 90, §6(p)]

Case Notes

Costs on appeal may be divided. 21 H. 280 (1912).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next